Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.578

Petition by agency for enforcement.

(1) In addition to other remedies provided by law, an agency may seek enforcement of its rule or order by filing a petition for civil enforcement in the superior court.

(2) The petition must name as respondent each alleged person against whom the agency seeks to obtain civil enforcement.

(3) Venue is determined as in other civil cases.

(4) A petition for civil enforcement filed by an agency may request, and the court may grant, declaratory relief, temporary or permanent injunctive relief, any other civil remedy provided by law, or any combination of the foregoing.

[ 1988 c 288 s 518.]